South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S282.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: The Clarendon County Aeronautics Commission SECTION 1. Section 1 of Act 78 of 1965, as last amended by Act 222 of 1983, is further amended to read: Section 1. There is hereby created a commission for Clarendon County to be known as the "Clarendon County Aeronautics Commission" which shall consist of seven members who are residents of the county, and who shall be appointed by the Governor upon the recommendation of the Clarendon County Legislative Delegation. The terms of the members shall be for five years, and until their successors have been appointed and qualify; provided, that their initial terms shall be for five, four, three, two, and one years, respectively. Any vacancy shall be filled for the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as appointments are made for the full term. Members of the commission shall receive no compensation for their services. The commission shall select one of its members as chairman. Meetings live streamed SECTION 2.    All meetings of the Clarendon County Aeronautics Commission shall be live streamed and archived on the Clarendon County government website. Freedom of Information Act SECTION 3.    The Clarendon County Aeronautics Commission is subject to the provisions of the Freedom of Information Act, Section 30-4-10, et seq. of the S.C. Code. Time effective SECTION 4.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 6th day of March, 2025. Approved the 7th day of March, 2025. __________